Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-5902
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Assisted-Living Facility Act are to supplement provisions of the Health Care Facility Licensure Act relating to the licensure and regulation of assisted-living facilities, to provide for the health and safety of residents of such facilities, and to promote the goals of individualized decisionmaking and personal autonomy.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 46;

Laws 2018, LB439, § 3.
July 19, 2018
Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.